Illinois, session 104th, SB2992.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The School Code is amended by changing Section 521B-20 as follows: 6    (105 ILCS 5/21B-20)7    Sec. 21B-20. Types of licenses. The State Board of 8Education shall implement a system of educator licensure, 9whereby individuals employed in school districts who are 10required to be licensed must have one of the following 11licenses: (i) a professional educator license; (ii) an 12educator license with stipulations; (iii) a substitute 13teaching license; or (iv) until June 30, 2028, a short-term 14substitute teaching license. References in law regarding 15individuals certified or certificated or required to be 16certified or certificated under Article 21 of this Code shall 17also include individuals licensed or required to be licensed 18under this Article. The first year of all licenses ends on June 1930 following one full year of the license being issued.20    The State Board of Education, in consultation with the 21State Educator Preparation and Licensure Board, may adopt such 22rules as may be necessary to govern the requirements for 23licenses and endorsements under this Section.   SB2992- 2 -LRB104 18542 LNS 31985 b1        (1) Professional Educator License. Persons who (i) 2    have successfully completed an approved educator 3    preparation program and are recommended for licensure by 4    the Illinois institution offering the educator preparation 5    program, (ii) have successfully completed the required 6    testing under Section 21B-30 of this Code, (iii) have 7    successfully completed coursework on the psychology of, 8    the identification of, and the methods of instruction for 9    the exceptional child, including, without limitation, 10    children with learning disabilities, (iv) have 11    successfully completed coursework in methods of reading 12    and reading in the content area, and (v) have met all other 13    criteria established by rule of the State Board of 14    Education shall be issued a Professional Educator License. 15    Persons seeking a Professional Educator License with a 16    school support personnel endorsement or chief school 17    business official endorsement are exempt from the 18    requirements in items (iii) and (iv). All Professional 19    Educator Licenses are valid until June 30 immediately 20    following 5 years of the license being issued. The 21    Professional Educator License shall be endorsed with 22    specific areas and grade levels in which the individual is 23    eligible to practice. For an early childhood education 24    endorsement, an individual may satisfy the student 25    teaching requirement of his or her early childhood teacher 26    preparation program through placement in a setting with   SB2992- 3 -LRB104 18542 LNS 31985 b1    children from birth through grade 2, and the individual 2    may be paid and receive credit while student teaching. The 3    student teaching experience must meet the requirements of 4    and be approved by the individual's early childhood 5    teacher preparation program. No institution of higher 6    education shall establish or maintain any policy which 7    requires student teaching for preservice teachers to be 8    unpaid. 9        Individuals can receive subsequent endorsements on the 10    Professional Educator License. Subsequent endorsements 11    shall require a minimum of 24 semester hours of coursework 12    in the endorsement area and passage of the applicable 13    content area test, unless otherwise specified by rule.14        (2) Educator License with Stipulations. An Educator 15    License with Stipulations shall be issued an endorsement 16    that limits the license holder to one particular position 17    or does not require completion of an approved educator 18    program or both.19        An individual with an Educator License with 20    Stipulations must not be employed by a school district or 21    any other entity to replace any presently employed teacher 22    who otherwise would not be replaced for any reason.23        An Educator License with Stipulations may be issued 24    with the following endorsements:25            (A) (Blank). 26            (B) Alternative provisional educator. An   SB2992- 4 -LRB104 18542 LNS 31985 b1        alternative provisional educator endorsement on an 2        Educator License with Stipulations may be issued to an 3        applicant who, at the time of applying for the 4        endorsement, has done all of the following:5                (i) Graduated from a regionally accredited 6            college or university with a minimum of a 7            bachelor's degree.8                (ii) Successfully completed the first phase of 9            the Alternative Educator Licensure Program for 10            Teachers, as described in Section 21B-50 of this 11            Code.12                (iii) Passed a content area test, as required 13            under Section 21B-30 of this Code.14        The alternative provisional educator endorsement is 15    valid for 2 years of teaching and may be renewed for a 16    third year by an individual meeting the requirements set 17    forth in Section 21B-50 of this Code. 18            (C) Alternative provisional superintendent. An 19        alternative provisional superintendent endorsement on 20        an Educator License with Stipulations entitles the 21        holder to serve only as a superintendent or assistant 22        superintendent in a school district's central office. 23        This endorsement may only be issued to an applicant 24        who, at the time of applying for the endorsement, has 25        done all of the following:26                (i) Graduated from a regionally accredited   SB2992- 5 -LRB104 18542 LNS 31985 b1            college or university with a minimum of a master's 2            degree in a management field other than education.3                (ii) Been employed for a period of at least 5 4            years in a management level position in a field 5            other than education.6                (iii) Successfully completed the first phase 7            of an alternative route to superintendent 8            endorsement program, as provided in Section 21B-55 9            of this Code.10                (iv) Passed a content area test required under 11            Section 21B-30 of this Code.12            The endorsement is valid for 2 fiscal years in 13        order to complete one full year of serving as a 14        superintendent or assistant superintendent.15            (D) (Blank).16            (E) Career and technical educator. A career and 17        technical educator endorsement on an Educator License 18        with Stipulations may be issued to an applicant who 19        has a minimum of 60 semester hours of coursework from a 20        regionally accredited institution of higher education 21        or an accredited trade and technical institution and 22        has a minimum of 2,000 hours of experience outside of 23        education in each area to be taught.24            The career and technical educator endorsement on 25        an Educator License with Stipulations is valid until 26        June 30 immediately following 5 years of the   SB2992- 6 -LRB104 18542 LNS 31985 b1        endorsement being issued and may be renewed.2            An individual who holds a valid career and 3        technical educator endorsement on an Educator License 4        with Stipulations but does not hold a bachelor's 5        degree may substitute teach in career and technical 6        education classrooms. 7            An individual who holds a valid career and 8        technical educator endorsement on an Educator License 9        with Stipulations is entitled to all of the rights and 10        privileges granted to a holder of a Professional 11        Educator License. 12            (F) (Blank).13            (G) Transitional bilingual educator. A 14        transitional bilingual educator endorsement on an 15        Educator License with Stipulations may be issued for 16        the purpose of providing instruction in accordance 17        with Article 14C of this Code to an applicant who 18        provides satisfactory evidence that he or she meets 19        all of the following requirements:20                (i) Possesses adequate speaking, reading, and 21            writing ability in the language other than English 22            in which transitional bilingual education is 23            offered.24                (ii) Has the ability to successfully 25            communicate in English.26                (iii) Either possessed, within 5 years   SB2992- 7 -LRB104 18542 LNS 31985 b1            previous to his or her applying for a transitional 2            bilingual educator endorsement, a valid and 3            comparable teaching certificate or comparable 4            authorization issued by a foreign country or holds 5            a degree from an institution of higher learning in 6            a foreign country that the State Educator 7            Preparation and Licensure Board determines to be 8            the equivalent of a bachelor's degree from a 9            regionally accredited institution of higher 10            learning in the United States.11            A transitional bilingual educator endorsement 12        shall be valid for prekindergarten through grade 12, 13        is valid until June 30 immediately following 5 years 14        of the endorsement being issued, and shall not be 15        renewed.16            Persons holding a transitional bilingual educator 17        endorsement shall not be employed to replace any 18        presently employed teacher who otherwise would not be 19        replaced for any reason. 20            (H) Language endorsement. In an effort to 21        alleviate the shortage of teachers speaking a language 22        other than English in the public schools, an 23        individual who holds an Educator License with 24        Stipulations may also apply for a language 25        endorsement, provided that the applicant provides 26        satisfactory evidence that he or she meets all of the   SB2992- 8 -LRB104 18542 LNS 31985 b1        following requirements:2                (i) Holds a transitional bilingual 3            endorsement. 4                (ii) Has demonstrated proficiency in the 5            language for which the endorsement is to be issued 6            by passing the applicable language content test 7            required by the State Board of Education.8                (iii) Holds a bachelor's degree or higher from 9            a regionally accredited institution of higher 10            education or, for individuals educated in a 11            country other than the United States, holds a 12            degree from an institution of higher learning in a 13            foreign country that the State Educator 14            Preparation and Licensure Board determines to be 15            the equivalent of a bachelor's degree from a 16            regionally accredited institution of higher 17            learning in the United States.18                (iv) (Blank).19            A language endorsement on an Educator License with 20        Stipulations is valid for prekindergarten through 21        grade 12 for the same validity period as the 22        individual's transitional bilingual educator 23        endorsement on the Educator License with Stipulations 24        and shall not be renewed.25            (I) Visiting international educator. A visiting 26        international educator endorsement on an Educator   SB2992- 9 -LRB104 18542 LNS 31985 b1        License with Stipulations may be issued to an 2        individual who is being recruited by a particular 3        school district that conducts formal recruitment 4        programs outside of the United States to secure the 5        services of qualified teachers and who meets all of 6        the following requirements:7                (i) Holds the equivalent of a minimum of a 8            bachelor's degree issued in the United States.9                (ii) Has been prepared as a teacher at the 10            grade level for which he or she will be employed.11                (iii) Has adequate content knowledge in the 12            subject to be taught.13                (iv) Has an adequate command of the English 14            language.15            A holder of a visiting international educator 16        endorsement on an Educator License with Stipulations 17        shall be permitted to teach in bilingual education 18        programs in the language that was the medium of 19        instruction in his or her teacher preparation program, 20        provided that he or she passes the English Language 21        Proficiency Examination or another test of writing 22        skills in English identified by the State Board of 23        Education, in consultation with the State Educator 24        Preparation and Licensure Board.25            A visiting international educator endorsement on 26        an Educator License with Stipulations is valid for 5   SB2992- 10 -LRB104 18542 LNS 31985 b1        years and shall not be renewed.2            (J) Paraprofessional educator. A paraprofessional 3        educator endorsement on an Educator License with 4        Stipulations may be issued to an applicant who holds a 5        high school diploma or its recognized equivalent and 6        (i) holds an associate's degree or a minimum of 60 7        semester hours of credit from a regionally accredited 8        institution of higher education; (ii) has passed a 9        paraprofessional competency test under subsection 10        (c-5) of Section 21B-30; or (iii) is at least 18 years 11        of age and will be using the Educator License with 12        Stipulations exclusively for grades prekindergarten 13        through grade 8, until the individual reaches the age 14        of 19 years and otherwise meets the criteria for a 15        paraprofessional educator endorsement pursuant to this 16        subparagraph (J). The paraprofessional educator 17        endorsement is valid until June 30 immediately 18        following 5 years of the endorsement being issued and 19        may be renewed through application and payment of the 20        appropriate fee, as required under Section 21B-40 of 21        this Code. An individual who holds only a 22        paraprofessional educator endorsement is not subject 23        to additional requirements in order to renew the 24        endorsement.25            Short-term approval of a paraprofessional educator 26        endorsement on an Educator License with Stipulations   SB2992- 11 -LRB104 18542 LNS 31985 b1        shall be given to an individual who meets the 2        requirements set forth in the Illinois Administrative 3        Code; however, the short-term approval expires on June 4        30 immediately following 5 full fiscal years after the 5        approval was given. 6            (K) Chief school business official. A chief school 7        business official endorsement on an Educator License 8        with Stipulations may be issued to an applicant who 9        qualifies by having a master's degree or higher, 2 10        years of full-time administrative experience in school 11        business management or 2 years of university-approved 12        practical experience, and a minimum of 24 semester 13        hours of graduate credit in a program approved by the 14        State Board of Education for the preparation of school 15        business administrators and by passage of the 16        applicable State tests, including an applicable 17        content area test. 18            The chief school business official endorsement may 19        also be affixed to the Educator License with 20        Stipulations of any holder who qualifies by having a 21        master's degree in business administration, finance, 22        accounting, or public administration and who completes 23        an additional 6 semester hours of internship in school 24        business management from a regionally accredited 25        institution of higher education and passes the 26        applicable State tests, including an applicable   SB2992- 12 -LRB104 18542 LNS 31985 b1        content area test. This endorsement shall be required 2        for any individual employed as a chief school business 3        official. 4            The chief school business official endorsement on 5        an Educator License with Stipulations is valid until 6        June 30 immediately following 5 years of the 7        endorsement being issued and may be renewed if the 8        license holder completes renewal requirements as 9        required for individuals who hold a Professional 10        Educator License endorsed for chief school business 11        official under Section 21B-45 of this Code and such 12        rules as may be adopted by the State Board of 13        Education. 14            The State Board of Education shall adopt any rules 15        necessary to implement Public Act 100-288.16            (L) Provisional in-state educator. A provisional 17        in-state educator endorsement on an Educator License 18        with Stipulations may be issued to a candidate who has 19        completed an Illinois-approved educator preparation 20        program at an Illinois institution of higher education 21        and who has not successfully completed an 22        evidence-based assessment of teacher effectiveness but 23        who meets all of the following requirements: 24                (i) Holds at least a bachelor's degree.25                (ii) Has completed an approved educator 26            preparation program at an Illinois institution.  SB2992- 13 -LRB104 18542 LNS 31985 b1                (iii) Has passed an applicable content area 2            test, as required by Section 21B-30 of this Code.3                (iv) Has attempted an evidence-based 4            assessment of teacher effectiveness and received a 5            minimum score on that assessment, as established 6            by the State Board of Education in consultation 7            with the State Educator Preparation and Licensure 8            Board.9            A provisional in-state educator endorsement on an 10        Educator License with Stipulations is valid for one 11        full fiscal year after the date of issuance and may not 12        be renewed.13            (M) (Blank).14            (N) Specialized services. A specialized services 15        endorsement on an Educator License with Stipulations 16        may be issued as defined and specified by rule. 17            (O) Provisional career and technical educator. A 18        provisional career and technical educator endorsement 19        on an Educator License with Stipulations may be issued 20        to an applicant who has a minimum of 8,000 hours of 21        work experience in the skill for which the applicant 22        is seeking the endorsement. Each employing school 23        board and regional office of education shall provide 24        verification, in writing, to the State Superintendent 25        of Education at the time the application is submitted 26        that no qualified teacher holding a Professional   SB2992- 14 -LRB104 18542 LNS 31985 b1        Educator License or an Educator License with 2        Stipulations with a career and technical educator 3        endorsement is available to teach and that actual 4        circumstances require such issuance.5            A provisional career and technical educator 6        endorsement on an Educator License with Stipulations 7        is valid until June 30 immediately following 5 years 8        of the endorsement being issued and may be renewed.9            An individual who holds a provisional career and 10        technical educator endorsement on an Educator License 11        with Stipulations may teach as a substitute teacher in 12        career and technical education classrooms. 13            An individual who holds a provisional career and 14        technical educator endorsement on an Educator License 15        with Stipulations is entitled to all of the rights and 16        privileges granted to a holder of a Professional 17        Educator License. 18        (3) Substitute Teaching License. A Substitute Teaching 19    License may be issued to qualified applicants for 20    substitute teaching in all grades of the public schools, 21    prekindergarten through grade 12. Substitute Teaching 22    Licenses are not eligible for endorsements. Applicants for 23    a Substitute Teaching License must hold a bachelor's 24    degree or higher from a regionally accredited institution 25    of higher education or must be enrolled in an approved 26    educator preparation program in this State and have earned   SB2992- 15 -LRB104 18542 LNS 31985 b1    at least 90 credit hours.2        Substitute Teaching Licenses are valid for 5 years.3        Substitute Teaching Licenses are valid for substitute 4    teaching in every county of this State. If an individual 5    has had his or her Professional Educator License or 6    Educator License with Stipulations suspended or revoked, 7    then that individual is not eligible to obtain a 8    Substitute Teaching License.9        A substitute teacher may only teach in the place of a 10    licensed teacher who is under contract with the employing 11    board. If, however, there is no licensed teacher under 12    contract because of an emergency situation, then a 13    district may employ a substitute teacher for no longer 14    than 30 calendar days per each vacant position in the 15    district if the district notifies the appropriate regional 16    office of education within 5 business days after the 17    employment of the substitute teacher in that vacant 18    position. A district may continue to employ that same 19    substitute teacher in that same vacant position for 90 20    calendar days or until the end of the semester, whichever 21    is greater, if, prior to the expiration of the 22    30-calendar-day period then current, the district files a 23    written request with the appropriate regional office of 24    education for a 30-calendar-day extension on the basis 25    that the position remains vacant and the district 26    continues to actively seek qualified candidates and   SB2992- 16 -LRB104 18542 LNS 31985 b1    provides documentation that it has provided training 2    specific to the position, including training on meeting 3    the needs of students with disabilities and English 4    learners if applicable. Each extension request shall be 5    granted in writing by the regional office of education. An 6    emergency situation is one in which an unforeseen vacancy 7    has occurred and (i) a teacher is unexpectedly unable to 8    fulfill his or her contractual duties or (ii) teacher 9    capacity needs of the district exceed previous indications 10    or vacancies are unfilled due to a lack of qualified 11    candidates, and the district is actively engaged in 12    advertising to hire a fully licensed teacher for the 13    vacant position.14        There is no limit on the number of days that a 15    substitute teacher may teach in a single school district, 16    provided that no substitute teacher may teach for longer 17    than 120 days beginning with the 2021-2022 school year 18    through the 2022-2023 school year, otherwise 90 school 19    days for any one licensed teacher under contract in the 20    same school year. A substitute teacher who holds a 21    Professional Educator License or Educator License with 22    Stipulations shall not teach for more than 120 school days 23    for any one licensed teacher under contract in the same 24    school year. The limitations in this paragraph (3) on the 25    number of days a substitute teacher may be employed do not 26    apply to any school district operating under Article 34 of   SB2992- 17 -LRB104 18542 LNS 31985 b1    this Code.2        A school district may not require an individual who 3    holds a valid Professional Educator License or Educator 4    License with Stipulations to seek or hold a Substitute 5    Teaching License to teach as a substitute teacher. 6        (4) Short-Term Substitute Teaching License. Beginning 7    on July 1, 2018 and until June 30, 2028, applicants may 8    apply to the State Board of Education for issuance of a 9    Short-Term Substitute Teaching License. A Short-Term 10    Substitute Teaching License may be issued to a qualified 11    applicant for substitute teaching in all grades of the 12    public schools, prekindergarten through grade 12. 13    Short-Term Substitute Teaching Licenses are not eligible 14    for endorsements. Applicants for a Short-Term Substitute 15    Teaching License must hold an associate's degree or have 16    completed at least 60 credit hours from a regionally 17    accredited institution of higher education.18        Short-Term Substitute Teaching Licenses are valid for 19    substitute teaching in every county of this State. If an 20    individual has had his or her Professional Educator 21    License or Educator License with Stipulations suspended or 22    revoked, then that individual is not eligible to obtain a 23    Short-Term Substitute Teaching License.24        The provisions of Sections 10-21.9 and 34-18.5 of this 25    Code apply to short-term substitute teachers. 26        An individual holding a Short-Term Substitute Teaching   SB2992- 18 -LRB104 18542 LNS 31985 b1    License may teach no more than 15 consecutive days per 2    licensed teacher who is under contract. For teacher 3    absences lasting 6 or more days per licensed teacher who 4    is under contract, a school district may not hire an 5    individual holding a Short-Term Substitute Teaching 6    License, unless the Governor has declared a disaster due 7    to a public health emergency pursuant to Section 7 of the 8    Illinois Emergency Management Agency Act. An individual 9    holding a Short-Term Substitute Teaching License must 10    complete the training program under Section 10-20.67 or 11    34-18.60 of this Code to be eligible to teach at a public 12    school. Short-Term Substitute Teaching Licenses under this 13    Section are valid for 5 years. 14(Source: P.A. 103-111, eff. 6-29-23; 103-154, eff. 6-30-23; 15103-193, eff. 1-1-24; 103-564, eff. 11-17-23; 103-617, eff. 167-1-24; 104-128, eff. 1-1-26; 104-316, eff. 8-15-25; revised 1711-20-25.) 18    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 192026.